Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 9
ADJUDICATORY PROCEEDINGS

19-2.5-901. Informal adjustment.

The district attorney may request of the court at any time, either before, during, or after the filing of a petition, that the matter be handled as an informal adjustment if:

The juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or legal custodian have been informed of their constitutional and legal rights, including the right to have counsel at every stage of the proceedings;

There are sufficient facts to establish the court's jurisdiction; and

The juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or legal custodian have waived the right to a speedy trial.

An informal adjustment must be for an initial period of no longer than six months. One additional extension of up to six months may be ordered by the court upon showing of good cause.

During any informal adjustment, the court may place the juvenile under the supervision of the probation department or other designated agency. The court may require further conditions of conduct, as requested by the district attorney, probation department,
or designated agency.

A juvenile shall not be granted an informal adjustment if the juvenile has been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent within the preceding twelve months, has had a prior deferred adjudication, or has had an informal adjustment granted within the preceding
twelve months.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 622, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-703 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-902. Entry of plea.

Upon the entry of a plea of not guilty to the allegations contained in the petition, the court shall set the matter for an adjudicatory trial. Except as set forth in section 19-2.5-610, the court shall hold the adjudicatory trial within sixty days after
the entry of a plea of not guilty.

Upon the entry of a plea of guilty to one or more of the allegations contained in the petition, the court shall advise the juvenile in accordance with rule 3 of the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure. The advisement must include the possibility of restorative
justice practices, including victim-offender conferences if restorative justice practices are available in the jurisdiction. The advisement regarding restorative justice practices does not establish any right to restorative justice
practices on the juvenile's behalf.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 622, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-708 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-903. Deferral of adjudication.

Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, in any case in which the juvenile has agreed with the district attorney to enter a plea of guilty, the court, with the consent of the juvenile and the district attorney, upon accepting the guilty
plea and entering an order deferring adjudication, may continue the case for a period not to exceed one year after the date of entry of the order deferring adjudication. The court may continue the case for an additional one-year
period for good cause.

In a case in which the juvenile has agreed with the district attorney to enter a plea of guilty, resulting in a conviction, as defined in section 16-22-102 (3), for unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), the court, with the consent
of the juvenile and district attorney, upon accepting the guilty plea and entering an order deferring adjudication, may continue the case for a period of time not to exceed two years after the date of the order deferring adjudication.
Upon a showing of good cause, the court may continue the case for additional time, not to exceed five years after the date of the order deferring adjudication.

A juvenile granted a deferral of adjudication pursuant to this section may be placed under the supervision of a probation department. The court may impose any conditions of supervision that it deems appropriate that are stipulated to by the juvenile and
the district attorney.

Upon full compliance with the conditions of supervision, the plea of the juvenile or the finding of guilt by the court must be withdrawn and the case dismissed with prejudice.

The district attorney or a probation officer may make an application for entry of adjudication and imposition of sentence at any time within the term of the deferred adjudication or within thirty-five days thereafter.

If the juvenile fails to comply with the terms of supervision, the court shall enter an order of adjudication and proceed to sentencing pursuant to section 19-2.5-1102. Lack of compliance is a matter to be determined by the court without a jury, upon
written application of the district attorney or probation department. At least seven days' notice must be given to the juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or legal custodian. The burden of proof is the same as if the
matter were being heard as a probation revocation proceeding.

If the juvenile agrees to a deferral of adjudication, the juvenile waives all rights to a speedy trial and sentencing.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 622, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-709 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-904. Speedy trial - procedural schedule.

The juvenile's right to a speedy trial is governed by section 18-1-405 and rule 48(b) of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

In bringing an adjudicatory action against a juvenile pursuant to this article 2.5, the district attorney and the court shall comply with the deadlines for:

Holding the detention hearing, as specified in section 19-2.5-305 (3)(a)(I);

Filing the petition, as specified in section 19-2.5-305 (3)(a)(IX);

Setting the first appearance, as specified in section 19-2.5-501 (4); and

Holding the adjudicatory trial, as specified in section 19-2.5-902 (1).

The court may grant a continuance with regard to any of the deadlines specified in subsection (2) of this section upon making a finding of good cause.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 623, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-108 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-905. Evidentiary considerations.

All statutes and rules of this state that apply to evidentiary considerations in adult criminal proceedings apply to proceedings pursuant to this title 19 except as otherwise specifically provided.

In any case brought pursuant to this title 19, the credibility of any witness may be challenged because of the witness's prior adult felony convictions and juvenile felony adjudications. The fact of such conviction or adjudication may be proved either
by the witness through testimony or by other competent evidence.

Prior to the juvenile resting the juvenile's case, the trial court shall advise the juvenile outside the presence of the jury that:

The juvenile has a right to testify in the juvenile's own behalf;

If the juvenile wants to testify, no one, including the juvenile's attorney, can prevent the juvenile from doing so;

If the juvenile testifies, the prosecutor will be allowed to cross-examine the juvenile;

If the juvenile has been convicted or adjudicated for a felony, the prosecutor is entitled to ask the juvenile about it and thereby disclose it to the jury;

If a felony conviction or adjudication is disclosed to the jury, the jury can be instructed to consider it only as it bears upon the juvenile's credibility;

The juvenile has a right not to testify and that, if the juvenile does not testify, the jury must be instructed about such right.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 624, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-802 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-906. Admissibility of evidence - legislative declaration - definitions.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, when evidence is sought to be excluded from the trier of fact in a delinquency proceeding because of the conduct of a peace officer leading to its discovery, such evidence should not be suppressed if otherwise
admissible when the proponent of the evidence can show that the conduct in question was taken in a reasonable, good-faith belief that it was proper. It is further declared to be the general assembly's intent to identify the characteristics
of admissible evidence and not to address or attempt to prescribe court procedure.

For purposes of this section:

"Good-faith mistake" means a reasonable error of judgment concerning the existence of facts or law that, if true, would be sufficient to constitute probable cause.

"Peace officer" has the meaning set forth in section 16-2.5-101.

"Technical violation" means a reasonable, good-faith reliance upon a statute that is later ruled unconstitutional, a warrant that is later invalidated due to a good-faith mistake, or a court precedent that is later overruled.

The court shall not suppress evidence sought to be excluded in a delinquency proceeding because of the conduct of the peace officer leading to its discovery if the court finds that the evidence was seized by the peace officer as a result of a good-faith
mistake or a technical violation and the evidence is otherwise admissible.

The court shall not supress in a delinquency proceeding evidence that is obtained as a result of a confession voluntarily made in a noncustodial setting if the evidence is otherwise admissible.

It is prima facie evidence that the conduct of the peace officer was taken in the reasonable good-faith belief that it was proper if there is a showing that the evidence was obtained pursuant to and within the scope of a warrant, unless the warrant was
obtained through intentional and material misrepresentation.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 624, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-803 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-907. Procedures at trial.

At the adjudicatory trial, that must be conducted pursuant to section 19-1-106, the court shall consider whether the allegations of the petition are supported by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt. Jurisdictional matters of the age and residence of the
juvenile are deemed admitted by or on behalf of the juvenile unless specifically denied within a reasonable time prior to the trial.

If the juvenile is found not guilty after an adjudicatory trial, the court shall order the petition dismissed and the juvenile discharged from any detention or restriction previously ordered. The juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian
are also discharged from any restriction or other previous temporary order.

If the juvenile is found guilty after an adjudicatory trial, the court may proceed to sentencing or direct that the matter be set for a separate sentencing hearing within forty-nine days following completion of the adjudicatory trial.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 625, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-804 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-908. Method of jury selection.

Examination and selection of jurors are governed by rule 47 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure; except that challenges for cause are governed by rule 24 of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 625, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-805 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-909. Motion for new trial.

All motions for a new trial must be made pursuant to rule 33 of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

If the juvenile was not represented by counsel, the court shall inform the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian at the conclusion of the trial that they have the right to file a motion for a new trial and that, if such motion
is denied, they have the right to appeal.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 626, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-902 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-910. Adjudication - collateral relief - application - definitions.

At the time of the entry of adjudication or at any time thereafter, upon the request of the adjudicated juvenile or upon the court's own motion, a court may enter an order of collateral relief in the juvenile's case for the purpose of improving the juvenile's
likelihood of success in the community.

Application contents.

An application for an order of collateral relief must cite the grounds for granting the relief, the type of relief sought, and the specific collateral consequence from which the applicant is seeking relief and must include a copy of a recent criminal
history record check. The state court administrator may produce an application form that an applicant may submit in application.

The applicant shall provide a copy of the application to the district attorney and to the regulatory or licensing body that has jurisdiction over the collateral consequence from which the applicant is seeking relief, if any, by certified mail or personal
service within fourteen days after filing the application with the court.

An application filed after an adjudication order has been entered must include a copy of a recent Colorado bureau of investigation fingerprint-based criminal history record check, the filing fee required by law, and an additional filing fee of thirty
dollars to cover the actual costs related to the application. A court shall waive the filing fees if it finds that the juvenile is indigent.

An order of collateral relief may relieve an adjudicated juvenile of any collateral consequences of the adjudication, whether in housing or employment barriers or any other sanction or disqualification that the court shall specify, including but not limited
to statutory, regulatory, or other collateral consequences that the court may see fit to relieve that will assist the adjudicated juvenile in successfully reintegrating into the community.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an order of collateral relief cannot relieve any collateral consequences imposed by law for licensure by the department of education or any collateral consequences imposed by law for employment with the judicial
branch, the department of corrections, the division of youth services in the department of human services, or any other law enforcement agency in the state of Colorado.

A court shall not issue an order of collateral relief if the adjudicated juvenile:

Has been adjudicated for a felony that included an element that requires a victim to suffer a serious bodily injury and the victim suffered a permanent impairment of the function of any part or organ of the body;

Has been adjudicated for a crime of violence as described in section 18-1.3-406; or

Is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to section 16-22-103.

Hearing.

The court may conduct a hearing on any matter relevant to the granting or denying of an application or include a hearing on the matter at the adjudicated juvenile's sentencing hearing and may take testimony under oath.

The court may hear testimony from victims or any proponent or opponent of the application and may hear arguments from the applicant and the district attorney.

Standard for granting relief.

A court may issue an order of collateral relief if the court finds that:

The order of collateral relief is consistent with the applicant's rehabilitation; and

Granting the application would improve the applicant's likelihood of success in reintegrating into society and is in the public's interest.

The court that previously issued an order of collateral relief, on its own motion or either by cause shown by the district attorney or on grounds offered by the applicant, may at any time issue a subsequent judgment to enlarge, limit, or circumscribe
the relief previously granted.

Upon the motion of the district attorney or probation officer or upon the court's own motion, a court may revoke an order of collateral relief upon evidence of a subsequent criminal conviction or adjudication or proof that the adjudicated juvenile is
no longer entitled to relief. Any bars, prohibitions, sanctions, and disqualifications relieved may be reinstated as of the date of the written order of revocation. The court shall provide a copy of the order of revocation
to the holder and to any regulatory or licensing entity that the adjudicated juvenile noticed in the juvenile's motion for relief.

If the court issues an order of collateral relief, it shall send a copy of the order of collateral relief through the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system to the Colorado bureau of investigation, and the Colorado bureau of investigation
shall note in the applicant's record in the Colorado crime information center that the order of collateral relief was issued.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adjudication" or "adjudicated" means a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere that is accepted by the court or an adjudication for a crime under the laws of any other state, the United States, or any territory subject
to the jurisdiction of the United States, which, if committed within this state, would be a crime. "Adjudication" or "adjudicated" also includes having received a deferred adjudication.

"Collateral consequence" means a collateral sanction or a disqualification.

"Collateral sanction" means a penalty, prohibition, bar, or disadvantage, however denominated, imposed on an individual as a result of the individual's adjudication for an offense, which penalty, prohibition, bar, or disadvantage applies by operation
of law regardless of whether the penalty, prohibition, bar, or disadvantage is included in the judgment or sentence. "Collateral sanction" does not include imprisonment, probation, parole, supervised release, forfeiture,
restitution, fine, assessment, costs of prosecution, or a restraint or sanction on an individual's driving privilege.

"Disqualification" means a penalty, prohibition, bar, or disadvantage, however denominated, that an administrative agency, governmental official, or court in a civil proceeding is authorized, but not required, to impose on an individual on grounds relating
to the individual's adjudication for an offense.

The provisions of this section apply to adjudications entered before, on, or after September 7, 2021.

Source:

L. 2021:
(9) added, (HB 21-1214), ch. 455, p. 3029, § 2, effective September 7; entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 626, § 2, effective October 1.